Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-15,308
Voluntary remediation.

In lieu of issuing an order under section 81-15,304, the director may allow the responsible person or any other person to voluntarily remediate site conditions under the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act. A person that voluntarily chooses to apply under section 81-15,184 must meet all requirements of such section. Based on the nature of the release, the director may require such person to pay for a contractor to oversee remedial work hired or approved by the department.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 8.
July 21, 2022
Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act, see section 81-15,181.